District of Columbia statutes.
16-3503

Refusal of Attorney General or United States attorney to act; procedure.

If the Attorney General or United States attorney refuses to institute a quo warranto proceeding on the request of a person interested, the interested person may apply to the court by certified petition for leave to have the writ issued. When, in the opinion of the court, the reasons set forth in the petition are sufficient in law, the writ shall be allowed to be issued by any attorney, in the name of the United States, on the relation of the interested person on his compliance with the condition prescribed by section 16-3502 as to security for costs.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 602, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 562, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)

Cross References

Superior Court of the District of Columbia, jurisdiction, see § 11-921.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3503.
1973 Ed., § 16-3503.